District of Columbia statutes.
25-120

Manager’s license requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A manager’s license shall authorize the licensee to manage a licensed business.

(b)

A licensee may be employed by one or more licensed businesses without further investigation, subject to compliance by the licensed businesses.

(c)

A manager’s license shall be valid for 2 years or until surrendered, suspended, or revoked. The fee for both years of the manager’s license shall be paid at the time of application.

(d)

A manager shall complete an alcohol training and education certification program conducted by a Board-approved provider. The manager shall be recertified every 2 years from the date of the initial certification.

(e)

A manager who is licensed on or before May 3, 2001, shall complete a certification program within 6 months of May 3, 2001.

(f)

A manager licensed under this section after May 3, 2001, shall complete the certification program prior to receiving his or her manager’s license.

(g)

Subsection (e) of this section shall not apply to a manager licensed on or before May 3, 2001, who provides proof of his or her prior certification within 2 years prior to May 3, 2001.

(h)

A manager required to complete an alcohol training and education certification program under this section shall submit proof of certification to the Board on a form supplied by a Board-approved training provider.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(a), 48 DCR 7612
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(d), 49 DCR 6968
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(e), 51 DCR 6525

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-121.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-42 validated the previously made technical corrections in subsecs. (e) and (g).
D.C. Law 14-190, in subsec. (c), substituted “The fee for both years of the manager’s license shall be paid at the time of application” for “The license fee shall be paid as provided under Chapter 5”.
D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (f), substituted “prior to receiving” for “within 90 days after receiving”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(a) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(d) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).